Utah statutes.
9-6-203.   Division powers relating to property.
(1)  The division may:
(a)  take by purchase, grant, gift, devise, or bequest, any property, real or
personal, for any purpose appropriate to its objects; and
(b)  convert property received by gift, grant, devise, or bequest and not
suitable for its uses, into other property so available or into money.
(2)  The property received or converted under Subsection (1) shall be held,
invested, and managed and its proceeds used by the division for the purposes
and under the conditions prescribed in the grant or donation.
(3)  If by the terms of any grant, gift, devise, or bequest, conditions are
imposed that are impracticable under the law, the grant or donation shall not
fail but the conditions shall be rejected and the intent of the grantor or
donor carried out as nearly as may be.
(4)  A grant, gift, devise, or bequest for the benefit of the division may not
be defeated or prejudiced by any misnomer, misdescription, or informality if
the intention of the grantor or donor can be shown or ascertained with
reasonable certainty.
